Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1857.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325M.40] MINOR ACCESS TO CHATBOTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Artificial intelligence" or "AI" means a machine-based system that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments. new text end new text begin (c) "AI companion" means artificial intelligence systems that are specifically designed, marketed, or optimized to form ongoing social or emotional bonds with individuals, whether or not such systems also provide information, complete tasks, or assist with specific functions. AI companions seek to build or engage in an emotional relationship with the user by: new text end new text begin (1) expressing or inviting emotional attachment; new text end new text begin (2) reminding, prompting, or nudging the user to return for emotional support or companionship; new text end new text begin (3) depicting nonverbal forms of emotional support; new text end new text begin (4) behaving in a way that a reasonable user would consider excessive praise designed to foster emotional attachment; or new text end new text begin (5) enabling or purporting to enable increased intimacy based on engagement or pay. new text end new text begin AI companion does not include a consumer electronic device that incorporates a speaker and voice command interface or text interface and acts as a voice- or text-activated virtual assistant. new text end new text begin (d) "Chatbot" means a generative artificial intelligence system that users can interact with or through an interface that approximates or simulates conversation through a text, audio, or visual medium that behave in a way that would lead a reasonable person to believe the chatbot is conveying that it has humanity, sentience, emotions, or desires. Chatbot does not include a consumer electronic device that incorporates a speaker and voice command interface or text interface and acts as a voice- or text-activated virtual assistant. new text end new text begin (e) "Minor" means an individual under the age of 18. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin (a) A person must ensure that any chatbot operated or distributed by the person does not make chatbots available to minors to use, interact with, purchase, or converse with. new text end new text begin (b) A person operating artificial intelligence systems that primarily function as AI companions must ensure that any chatbots operated or distributed by the person are not available to minors to use, interact with, purchase, or converse with. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Remedies; enforcement. new text end new text begin (a) An individual injured by a violation of this section may bring a civil action for damages, statutory damages not to exceed $1,000, injunctive relief, and costs and reasonable attorney fees. new text end new text begin (b) The attorney general may enforce this section under section 8.31. In an action brought under this paragraph, the person who owns or controls a website, application, software, or program and violates this section is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000,000. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 15, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin TRANSITION PERIOD.new text end new text begin A person who makes a chatbot available to minors must begin decreasing services in a manner that does not harm minors who use chatbots before services end on January 15, 2027. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end